Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.145.055

Opportunity scholarship program—Awards not considered state-funded.

The office of student financial assistance and the institutions of higher education may not consider awards made under the opportunity scholarship program to be state-funded for the purpose of determining the value of an award for other state financial aid programs.

[ 2019 c 406 s 68.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.79.195.

Findings—Short title—2019 c 406: See notes following RCW 28B.92.200.

Findings—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28B.94.020.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28C.30.050.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.216.135.